Maryland, session 2025, SB0876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0876*

SENATE BILL 876
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxiii) Beginning on July 1, 2025, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, coverage for biomarker
testing in accordance with § 15–859 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxiv) Beginning on January 1, 2025, shall provide coverage for
prostheses in accordance with § 15–844 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXV) BEGINNING ON JULY 1, 2026, SHALL PROVIDE
COMPREHENSIVE COVERAGE FOR THE TREATMENT OF OBESITY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 15–157 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
15–157.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMPREHENSIVE COVERAGE FOR THE TREATMENT OF OBESITY”
INCLUDES COVERAGE FOR INTENSIVE BEHAVIORAL THERAPY, BARIATRIC SURGERY,
AND FDA–APPROVED ANTI–OBESITY MEDICATION.
(3) “FDA–APPROVED ANTI–OBESITY MEDICATION” MEANS ANY
MEDICATION APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION WITH
AN INDICATION FOR CHRONIC WEIGHT MANAGEMENT IN PATIENTS WITH OBESITY.
(B) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE COMPREHENSIVE COVERAGE FOR THE
TREATMENT OF OBESITY.
(C) COVERAGE CRITERIA FOR FDA–APPROVED ANTI–OBESITY
MEDICATIONS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE MORE RESTRICTIVE
THAN THE FDA–APPROVED ANTI–OBESITY MEDICATION’S INDICATIONS FOR
TREATMENT.
(D) THE PROGRAM MAY UNDERTAKE UTILIZATION MANAGEMENT TO
DETERMINE THE MEDICAL NECESSITY AND APPROPRIATENESS FOR TREATMENT OF
OBESITY UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE DETERMINATIONS ARE MADE IN THE SAME
MANNER AS DETERMINATIONS ARE MADE FOR THE TREATMENT OF ANY OTHER
ILLNESS, CONDITION, OR DISORDER COVERED BY THE PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 876 3
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO PROGRAM RECIPIENTS
OF THE COVERAGE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before June 1, 2026,
the Maryland Department of Health shall provide notice to Maryland Medical Assistance
Program recipients of the coverage required by this Act in writing, and prominently
positioned in any literature or correspondence sent to Program recipients about coverage
available under the Program in calendar year 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.